Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5735
Changes to sections; when effective; applicability.

(1) The changes made in sections 77-5703, 77-5708, 77-5712, 77-5714, 77-5715, 77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726, 77-5727, and 77-5731 by Laws 2008, LB895, and sections 77-5707.01, 77-5719.01, and 77-5719.02 apply to all applications filed on and after April 18, 2008. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately prior to such date apply.

(2) The changes made in sections 77-5725 and 77-5726 by Laws 2010, LB879, apply to all applications filed on or after July 15, 2010. For all applications filed prior to such date, the taxpayer may make a one-time election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to have the changes made in sections 77-5725 and 77-5726 by Laws 2010, LB879, apply to such taxpayer's application, or in the absence of such an election, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately prior to July 15, 2010, apply to such application.

(3) The changes made in sections 77-5707, 77-5715, 77-5719, and 77-5725 by Laws 2010, LB918, apply to all applications filed on or after July 15, 2010. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately prior to such date apply.

(4) The changes made in sections 77-5701, 77-5703, 77-5705, 77-5715, 77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726, and 77-5727 by Laws 2012, LB1118, apply to all applications filed on or after March 8, 2012. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately prior to such date apply.

(5) The changes made in sections 77-5707.01, 77-5709, 77-5712, 77-5719, 77-5720, 77-5723, and 77-5726 by Laws 2013, LB34, apply to all applications filed on or after September 6, 2013. For all applications filed prior to such date, the provisions of the Nebraska Advantage Act as they existed immediately prior to such date apply.

(6) The changes made in section 77-5726 by Laws 2017, LB161, apply to all applications filed before, on, or after August 24, 2017.

(7) The changes made in sections 77-5705, 77-5723, 77-5725, 77-5726, and 77-5727 and in subsections (3), (6), and (7) of section 77-5731 by Laws 2022, LB1150, apply to any agreement entered into under the Nebraska Advantage Act that is still active on January 1, 2023, if the taxpayer makes a one-time election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In the absence of such an election, the provisions of such sections and subsections as they existed immediately prior to January 1, 2023, shall apply to such agreement. For each election made under this subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall disclose such election, the identity of the taxpayer, and the location of the taxpayer's project to each municipality in which the project is located. The Tax Commissioner shall make such disclosures within thirty days after the election.

(8) The changes made in sections 77-5723 and 77-5727 by Laws 2024, LB1088, apply to any agreement entered into under the Nebraska Advantage Act that is still active on July 19, 2024, if the taxpayer makes a one-time election, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In the absence of such an election, the provisions of such sections as they existed immediately prior to July 19, 2024, shall apply to such agreement.

(9) The changes made in section 77-5723 by Laws 2026, LB1165, apply to any agreement for a tier 6 project entered into under the Nebraska Advantage Act that is still active on July 18, 2026, if a taxpayer makes a one-time election and pays a fee of ninety thousand dollars, within the time period prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, to have such changes apply to such taxpayer's agreement. In the absence of such an election, the provisions of such section as it existed immediately prior to July 18, 2026, shall apply to such agreement.

Laws 2008, LB895, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB918, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB34, § 11;

Laws 2014, LB851, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB161, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1150, § 13;

Laws 2024, LB1088, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 16.
July 18, 2026